Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.093

Copy of notice of intention by water-sewer district to be sent officials.

Whenever a water-sewer district files with the board a notice of intention as required by RCW 36.93.090, the board shall send a copy of such notice of intention to the legislative authority of the county wherein such action is proposed to be taken and one copy to the state department of ecology.

[ 1999 c 153 s 45; 1971 ex.s. c 127 s 2.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.